Massachusetts, session 194th, H3207.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 22 of Chapter 270 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the words “equal to or greater than 51%” and
inserting in place thereof the following words: “equal to or greater than 33%.”
SECTION 2. Section 22 of Chapter 270 of the General Laws, as so amended, is further
amended by inserting after the word “products” the following new paragraph:
“Smoking bars that qualify under this section shall comply with all applicable health and
safety standards promulgated by the Department of Public Health, including but not limited to
regulations concerning ventilation, the safety of employees, and the protection of patrons from
secondhand smoke exposure.”
SECTION 3. Section 22 of Chapter 270 of the General Laws, as so amended, is further
amended by adding the following new paragraph:
of 2

“Smoking bars shall submit a quarterly declaration to the Department of Revenue to
demonstrate that revenue generated from the sale of tobacco products meets or exceeds the 33%
threshold of total combined revenue. The quarterly report shall include a breakdown of revenue
derived from the sale of tobacco products, food, and beverages to confirm continued compliance
with the 33% revenue requirement.”
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect immediately upon its passage.
of 2